Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1604
Repurchase of capital stock; limitation.

A bankers bank may repurchase, for its own account, shares of its own capital stock, but the outstanding capital stock may not be reduced below the minimum required by law.

Laws 1986, LB 1123, § 4.